Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1106.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 16, 1986 (P.L.1646, No.188), known as the Chiropractic Practice Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 102 OF THE ACT OF DECEMBER 16, 1986 <--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122 (P.L.1646, NO.188), KNOWN AS THE CHIROPRACTIC PRACTICE ACT, IS AMENDED BY ADDING DEFINITIONS TO READ:SECTION 102. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ACT SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:* * *"CERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT." AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS MET ALL OF THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ACT AND IS CERTIFIED AS A CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT IN ACCORDANCE WITH CHAPTER 5-A.* * *"DIRECT ON-PREMISES SUPERVISION." SUPERVISION CONDUCTED WHILE BEING PHYSICALLY PRESENT IN AN OFFICE SUITE OR FACILITY, BUT NOT NECESSARILY IN THE SAME ROOM, AND BEING IMMEDIATELY AVAILABLE.* * *"THERAPEUTIC EXERCISE." A THERAPEUTIC PROCEDURE OF USING EXERCISE TO DEVELOP STRENGTH, ENDURANCE, RANGE OF MOTION AND FLEXIBILITY.SECTION 2. SECTION 506 HEADING AND (A)(1), (3), (7), (8) AND (13) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED AND SUBSECTION (A) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:SECTION 506. REFUSAL, SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION OF LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE.(A) REASONS ENUMERATED.--THE BOARD MAY REFUSE TO ISSUE A LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE OR MAY SUSPEND OR REVOKE A LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE FOR ANY OF THE FOLLOWING REASONS:(1) FAILING TO DEMONSTRATE THE QUALIFICATIONS OR STANDARDS FOR A LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE CONTAINED IN THIS ACT OR REGULATIONS OF THE BOARD.20250HB1106PN3278 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(3) PRACTICING FRAUD OR DECEIT IN OBTAINING A LICENSE TO PRACTICE CHIROPRACTIC OR A CERTIFICATE TO PRACTICE AS A CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT.* * *(7) HAVING A LICENSE TO PRACTICE CHIROPRACTIC OR A CERTIFICATE TO PRACTICE AS A CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT SUSPENDED, REVOKED OR REFUSED OR RECEIVING OTHER DISCIPLINARY ACTION BY THE PROPER CHIROPRACTIC LICENSING AUTHORITY OF ANOTHER STATE, TERRITORY, POSSESSION OR COUNTRY.(8) BEING UNABLE TO PRACTICE CHIROPRACTIC WITH REASONABLE SKILL AND SAFETY TO PATIENTS BY REASON OF ILLNESS, DRUNKENNESS, EXCESSIVE USE OF DRUGS, NARCOTICS, CHEMICALS OR ANY OTHER TYPE OF MATERIAL, OR AS A RESULT OF ANY MENTAL OR PHYSICAL CONDITION. IN ENFORCING THIS PARAGRAPH, THE BOARD SHALL, UPON PROBABLE CAUSE, HAVE AUTHORITY TO COMPEL A CHIROPRACTOR OR CERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT TO SUBMIT TO A MENTAL OR PHYSICAL EXAMINATION BY PHYSICIANS APPROVED BY THE BOARD. FAILURE OF A CHIROPRACTOR OR CERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT TO SUBMIT TO SUCH EXAMINATION WHEN DIRECTED BY THE BOARD, UNLESS SUCH FAILURE IS DUE TO CIRCUMSTANCES BEYOND HIS CONTROL, SHALL CONSTITUTE AN ADMISSION OF THE ALLEGATIONS AGAINST HIM, CONSEQUENT UPON WHICH A DEFAULT AND FINAL ORDER MAY BE ENTERED WITHOUT THE TAKING OF TESTIMONY OR PRESENTATION OF EVIDENCE. A CHIROPRACTOR AFFECTED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL AT REASONABLE INTERVALS BE AFFORDED AN OPPORTUNITY TO DEMONSTRATE THAT HE CAN RESUME A COMPETENT PRACTICE OF CHIROPRACTIC WITH REASONABLE SKILL AND SAFETY TO PATIENTS. A CERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT AFFECTED UNDER THIS 20250HB1106PN3278 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PARAGRAPH SHALL, AT REASONABLE INTERVALS, BE AFFORDED AN OPPORTUNITY TO DEMONSTRATE THAT HE CAN RESUME COMPETENT PRACTICE AS A CERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT WITH REASONABLE SKILL AND SAFETY TO PATIENTS.* * *(13) FAILING TO PERFORM ANY STATUTORY OBLIGATION PLACED UPON A LICENSED CHIROPRACTOR OR CERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT.* * *(20) IN THE CASE OF A LICENSED CHIROPRACTOR, FAILING TO PROPERLY SUPERVISE A CERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ACT AND BOARD REGULATIONS.* * *SECTION 3. SECTION 523 OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 523. REPORTING OF MULTIPLE LICENSURE OR CERTIFICATION.ANY LICENSED CHIROPRACTOR OR CERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT OF THIS COMMONWEALTH WHO IS ALSO LICENSED TO PRACTICE CHIROPRACTIC OR CERTIFIED TO PRACTICE AS A CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT IN ANY OTHER STATE, TERRITORY, POSSESSION OR COUNTRY SHALL REPORT THIS INFORMATION TO THE BOARD ON THE BIENNIAL REGISTRATION APPLICATION. ANY DISCIPLINARY ACTION TAKEN IN SUCH OTHER JURISDICTION SHALL BE REPORTED TO THE BOARD ON THE BIENNIAL REGISTRATION APPLICATION OR WITHIN [90] 30 DAYS OF FINAL DISPOSITION, WHICHEVER IS SOONER. MULTIPLE LICENSURE OR CERTIFICATION SHALL BE NOTED BY THE BOARD ON THE CHIROPRACTOR'S OR CERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT'S RECORD AND SUCH STATE, TERRITORY, POSSESSION OR COUNTRY SHALL BE NOTIFIED BY THE BOARD OF ANY DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS TAKEN AGAINST SAID CHIROPRACTOR OR CERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT IN THIS COMMONWEALTH.SECTION 4. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A CHAPTER TO READ:20250HB1106PN3278 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CHAPTER 5-ACERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANTSSection 501-A. Chiropractic assistant certifications.(a) Eligibility.--To be eligible for certification by the board as a chiropractic assistant, an applicant shall:(1) be at least 18 years of age unless otherwise determined by the board;(2) possess a high school diploma or its equivalent;(3) prove to the satisfaction of the board that the individual is of good moral character and is not unfit or unable to practice as a chiropractic assistant by reason of physical or mental impairment. In assessing the moral character of an individual with a criminal conviction, the board shall conduct an individualized assessment in accordance with 63 Pa.C.S. § 3113 (relating to consideration of criminal convictions);(4) be a graduate of a nationally recognized chiropractic assistant program approved by the board; and(5) successfully pass an examination approved by the board, subject to rules and regulations established by the board and administered in accordance with section 812.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929. An applicant may not be certified as a certified chiropractic assistant unless the applicant has attained passing scores on the examination under this paragraph as published prior to the administration of the examination.(b) Temporary certification.--Upon the submission of an application for certification as a chiropractic assistant as provided by the board, the board shall issue a temporary 20250HB1106PN3278 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certificate to the applicant who meets the requirements under subsection (a)(1) , (2), (3) and (4) and is eligible to take the examination under subsection (a)(5) . The board shall issue only one temporary certificate under this subsection to an applicant. A temporary certificate under this subsection shall expire upon the applicant's failure of the first examination under subsection (a)(5), or six months after the date of issuance of the temporary certificate, whichever occurs first. Issuance of a temporary certificate under this subsection shall permit the applicant to engage in the practice of chiropractic assistance only while under the direct on-premises supervision of a licensed chiropractor. Upon the expiration of a temporary certificate under this subsection, the applicant shall promptly return the temporary certificate to the board.(c) Second examination.--If an applicant fails the first examination under subsection (a)(5), the applicant for certification, after the expiration of 60 days from the date of the first examination and no later than one year after the first examination, shall have the opportunity to take the examination a second time. The board may adopt regulations governing the eligibility of applicants who have failed to pass two examinations under subsection (a)(5) in order to be admitted to subsequent examinations.(d) Use of title.--Only an individual who has been properly certified as a chiropractic assistant with the board, in accordance with this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated by the board, shall assist a licensed chiropractor as a certified chiropractic assistant and use the title "certified chiropractic assistant" and the abbreviation "CCA."(e) Actions.--The board shall issue, renew, revoke or 20250HB1106PN3278 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 suspend the certification of a chiropractic assistant in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the board. All actions of the board under this subsection shall be taken subject to the right of notice, hearing and adjudication and the right of appeal in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).(f) Reinstatement.--Unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction, the board shall not reinstate the certification of an individual to practice as a chiropractic assistant that has been revoked under subsection (e). The individual may apply for certification as a chiropractic assistant after five years have elapsed since the date of revocation in accordance with this chapter.(g) Renewals.--For each certificate renewal, a CERTIFIED chiropractic assistant shall complete within the preceding two-year period at least 16 hours of continuing chiropractic education, including eight hours of in-person learning, as approved by the board in accordance with standards and criteria established by the board by rules and regulations. A certified chiropractic assistant shall provide the board with evidence of the completion of the continuing chiropractic education under this subsection. The board's rules and regulations shall remain in effect until such time as the board establishes by regulations, standards and criteria relating to continuing chiropractic education for certified chiropractic assistants. Section 502-A. Performance of chiropractic acts and services.(a) Supervision.--While providing assistance to a licensed chiropractor, a certified chiropractic assistant shall MAY only perform patient-related chiropractic acts and services that are assigned or delegated by and under the direct on-premises 20250HB1106PN3278 - 7 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 supervision of a licensed chiropractor.(b) Scope DELEGATION .--A certified chiropractic assistant may provide, demonstrate, administer or observe therapeutic exercise under the direct on-premises supervision of a licensed chiropractor AS DOCUMENTED IN THE PATIENT'S PLAN OF CARE DEVELOPED BY THE LICENSED CHIROPRACTOR . A certified chiropractic assistant may not perform evaluations, adjustments, test interpretations, other therapeutic procedures or the planning or modification of a plan of care for a patient.(c) Responsibility.--A licensed chiropractor shall be responsible for the performance of acts and services by a certified chiropractic assistant. In all practice settings, the initial patient contact shall be made by a licensed chiropractor for evaluation of the patient and establishment of a plan of care.(d) Consultation.--A certified chiropractic assistant shall consult with the supervising licensed chiropractor in the event of a change in the patient's condition that may require the assessment of a licensed chiropractor.(e) Limitation.--A licensed chiropractor shall not supervise more than three certified chiropractic assistants at any time. If there is a change of the licensed chiropractor supervising a certified chiropractic assistant, the succeeding licensed chiropractor shall be responsible for the ongoing supervision of the certified chiropractic assistant and shall be considered the supervising licensed chiropractor for the purpose of this section.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the term "therapeutic exercise" shall mean a therapeutic procedure of using exercise to develop strength, endurance, range of motion 20250HB1106PN3278 - 8 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and flexibility.SECTION 503-A. ADDITIONAL DUTIES OF BOARD.(A) REGULATIONS.--(1) THE BOARD SHALL PROMULGATE BY REGULATIONS THE QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE CERTIFICATION AND REGULATION OF CERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANTS. THE REGULATIONS SHALL PROVIDE FOR DISCIPLINARY ACTION AND THE GROUNDS FOR DISCIPLINARY ACTION.(2) THE BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE TEMPORARY CERTIFICATES UNTIL THE REGULATIONS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) ARE PROMULGATED.(B) FEES.--THE BOARD MAY ESTABLISH REASONABLE FEES FOR CERTIFICATION UNDER THIS CHAPTER.Section 2 5. Chapter 6 heading and section 601 SECTIONS 601, 702(2), (6) AND (9) AND 703 of the act are amended to read:CHAPTER 6UNLICENSED OR UNCERTIFIED SUPPORTIVE PERSONNELSection 601. Supportive personnel.(a) Construction.--Nothing in this act shall prohibit a licensed chiropractor from utilizing the assistance of unlicensed or uncertified supportive personnel performing under the direct on-premises supervision of a licensed chiropractor, provided that a chiropractor may not delegate any activity or duty to such unlicensed or uncertified individuals which requires formal education or training in the practice of chiropractic or the knowledge and skill of a licensed chiropractor.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the term "d irect on-premises supervision" shall mean supervision conducted while being physically present in the office suite or facility, but not necessarily in the same room and immediately available.20250HB1106PN3278 - 9 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.SECTION 702. VIOLATION OF OTHER PROVISIONS.A PERSON COMMITS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE THIRD DEGREE AND, UPON CONVICTION, SHALL BE SENTENCED TO PAY A FINE OF NOT MORE THAN $500, OR TO IMPRISONMENT FOR NOT MORE THAN SIX MONTHS, OR BOTH, IF HE COMMITS ANY ACT DECLARED UNLAWFUL BY ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS ACT, OTHER THAN SECTION 701, OR IF HE:* * *(2) PRACTICES FRAUD OR DECEIT IN OBTAINING A LICENSE TO PRACTICE CHIROPRACTIC OR A CERTIFICATE TO PRACTICE AS A CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT.* * *(6) KNOWINGLY AIDS, ASSISTS, PROCURES OR ADVISES ANY UNLICENSED OR UNCERTIFIED PERSON TO PRACTICE CHIROPRACTIC, CONTRARY TO THIS ACT OR REGULATIONS OF THE BOARD.* * *(9) FAILS TO PERFORM ANY STATUTORY OBLIGATION PLACED UPON A LICENSED CHIROPRACTOR OR CERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT.* * *SECTION 703. CIVIL PENALTY.IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER CIVIL REMEDY OR CRIMINAL PENALTY PROVIDED FOR IN THIS ACT, THE BOARD, BY A VOTE OF THE MAJORITY OF THE MAXIMUM NUMBER OF THE AUTHORIZED MEMBERSHIP OF THE BOARD AS PROVIDED BY LAW OR BY A VOTE OF THE MAJORITY OF THE DULY QUALIFIED AND CONFIRMED MEMBERSHIP OR A MINIMUM OF FOUR MEMBERS, WHICHEVER IS GREATER, MAY LEVY A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO $1,000 ON ANY CURRENT LICENSEE OR CERTIFICATE HOLDER WHO VIOLATES ANY PROVISION OF THIS ACT OR ON ANY PERSON WHO PRACTICES CHIROPRACTIC OR PRACTICES AS A CERTIFIED CHIROPRACTIC ASSISTANT 20250HB1106PN3278 - 10 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 WITHOUT BEING PROPERLY LICENSED OR CERTIFIED TO DO SO UNDER THIS ACT. THE BOARD SHALL LEVY THIS PENALTY ONLY AFTER AFFORDING THE ACCUSED PARTY THE OPPORTUNITY FOR A HEARING, AS PROVIDED IN TITLE 2 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES (RELATING TO ADMINISTRATIVE LAW AND PROCEDURE).SECTION 6. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250HB1106PN3278 - 11 - 123456